Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-145
Political subdivision; Internet auction system; authorized.

Any political subdivision may, at the discretion of the governing body of the subdivision, sell bonds which the political subdivision is authorized to issue under any provision of law using an Internet auction system. The governing body shall comply with all other statutory requirements for the issuance of the bonds.

Laws 2003, LB 175, § 16.